Wisconsin, session 2025, SB158.
do enact as follows:SB158,1Section 1. 28.11 (5m) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 28.11 (5m) (a) 2. and amended to read:28.11 (5m) (a) 2. The department may make grants, from the appropriation under s. 20.370 (5) (bw), to counties having lands entered under sub. (4) to fund all of the following for one professional forester in the position of county forest administrator or assistant county forest administrator:a. Up to 50 percent of the forester’s county forest administrator’s salary.b. Up to 50 percent of the forester’s county forest administrator’s fringe benefits, except that the fringe benefits may not exceed 40 percent of the forester’s county forest administrator’s salary.SB158,2Section 2. 28.11 (5m) (a) 1. of the statutes is created to read:28.11 (5m) (a) 1. In this paragraph, “county forest administrator” means an individual who is employed to manage a county forest program under s. 28.10 and this section and who has any of the following qualifications, except that it does not include an individual who is employed by the department: a. A bachelor’s or higher degree in forestry from a school of forestry with a curriculum accredited by the Society of American Foresters or an equivalent degree, as determined by the chief state forester.b. A bachelor’s or higher degree in natural resources, conservation, or wildlife and 3 or more years of experience managing a county forest program under s. 28.10 and this section.c. An associate degree in forestry and 3 or more years of experience managing a county forest program under s. 28.10 and this section.SB158,3Section 3. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to an application for a grant under s. 28.11 (5m) (a) 2. submitted on the effective date of this subsection.SB158,4Section 4. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect retroactive to January 1, 2025. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/sb158 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/sb158 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB158 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB158 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»SB158: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting